Washington statutes.
RCW 19.265.040

Borrower may rescind loan—Manner.

A borrower may rescind a loan, on or before the close of business on the next day of business, by either returning the original check issued for the loan or providing the amount of the loan in cash to the lender or the facilitator. The facilitator may not charge the borrower a fee for rescinding the loan or a refund anticipation loan fee if the loan is rescinded but may charge the borrower the administrative cost of establishing a bank account to electronically receive the refund.

[ 2005 c 471 s 5.]